Alabama, session 2026rs, HB152.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Article 7 of Chapter 47 of Title 16 of the
Code of Alabama 1975, commencing with Section 16-47-170,
establishing and providing for the School of Social Work of
Alabama, is repealed.
Section 2. This act shall become effective October 1,
2026.
Page 1

2026.
HB152 Enrolled









________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 29-Jan-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 01-Apr-26 Passed



Page 2